California, session 20252026, AB2482.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 35511 of the Education Code is amended to read:35511. An “action to reorganize districts” means either of the following:(a) An action to form a new school district, which is accomplished through any of, or any combination of, the following:(1) Dissolving two or more existing school districts of the same kind and forming one or more new school districts of that same kind from the entire territory of the original school districts.(2) Forming one or more new school districts of the same kind from all or parts of one or more existing school districts of that same kind.(3) Unifying school districts, including the consolidation of all or part of one or more high school districts with all or part of one or more component school districts into one or more new unified school districts.(4) Deunifying a school district, including the conversion of all or part of a unified school district into one or more new high school districts, each with two or more new component school districts.(b) An action to transfer territory, including the transfer of all or part of an existing school district to another existing school district.